Arkansas, session 2025, HB1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1002(3), concerning the legislative
intent for the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) Promotes the health, welfare, and stability of mothers and
their infants after birth through hospital-based community bridge
organizations;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1002(6), concerning the legislative
intent for the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, is amended
to read as follows:
(6) Addresses health-related social needs of Arkansans in rural
counties through hospital-based community bridge organizations and reduces
the additional risk for disease and premature death associated with living in
a rural county;
*JMB088*
02/04/2025 1:09:45 PM JMB088

HB1403

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1010(b)(1), concerning the community
bridge organizations under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Each community bridge organization shall be administered by a
hospital or a nonhospital entity under conditions established by the
Department of Human Services.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1010(b), concerning the community
bridge organizations under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(5) A nonhospital entity may serve eligible individuals under
subsection (a) of this section if the nonhospital entity meets any additional
criteria established by the Department of Human Services.






















02/04/2025 1:09:45 PM JMB088